Kentucky statutes. TITLE XL Crimes and Punishments
Crime Stoppers Organizations

431.570.
Definition of “crime stoppers organization.”

As used in KRS

431.570

to

431.595

, unless the context otherwise requires:

“Crime stoppers organization” means a private, nonprofit organization that accepts and disperses donations for rewards to persons who:

Report to the organization information concerning criminal activity and such information results in the arrest or indictment of the person committing the crime; or

Provide to the organization information pertaining to the recovery or confiscation of stolen property, contraband or illegal controlled substances.

Information provided in subsection (1) of this section shall be forwarded to the appropriate law enforcement agency.

History.

Enact. Acts 1992, ch. 59, § 1, effective July 14, 1992.

431.575.
Duties of organization.

A crime stoppers organization shall:

Foster the detection of crime and encourage persons to report information about criminal acts;

Encourage news and other media to promote local crime stoppers organizations and to inform the public of the functions of the organization;

Assist other crime stoppers organizations in forwarding information about criminal acts to the appropriate law enforcement agencies; and

Help law enforcement agencies detect and combat crime by increasing the flow of information to and between law enforcement agencies.

History.

Enact. Acts 1992, ch. 59, § 2, effective July 14, 1992.

431.580.
Circuit Court order required for production of reports — Records of reports confidential.

Records of a crime stoppers organization concerning a report of criminal activity shall not be compelled to be produced before a court or other tribunal except on the order of the Circuit Court.

Records of a crime stoppers organization relating to reports of criminal acts shall be confidential.

History.

Enact. Acts 1992, ch. 59, § 3, effective July 14, 1992.

431.585.
Unlawful disclosure of information.

A person who accepts a report of criminal activity on behalf of a crime stoppers organization shall be guilty of unlawful disclosure of information if the person intentionally or knowingly divulges to a person not employed by a law enforcement agency the identity of the person who made the report without the consent of the person who made the report.

Unlawful disclosure of information under this section shall be a Class A misdemeanor.

History.

Enact. Acts 1992, ch. 59, § 4, effective July 14, 1992.

431.590.
Repayment by convicted defendant of all or part of reward paid by organization.

In addition to any other penalty authorized by law, after a defendant has been convicted of an offense, excluding offenses committed under KRS Chapters 186 and 189, the judge shall order a defendant to repay all or part of a reward paid by a crime stoppers organization.

In determining the amount the defendant shall repay to a crime stoppers organization under subsection (1) of this section, the court shall consider the importance of the information to the prosecution of the defendant as provided by the arresting officer or the prosecuting attorney with due regard for the confidentiality of the crime stoppers organization records.

In this section, “crime stoppers organization” means an organization as defined by KRS

431.570

.

History.

Enact. Acts 1992, ch. 59, § 5, effective July 14, 1992.

431.595.
Assessment of repayment ordered as cost — Time of repayment — Court clerk’s duties.

Upon an order to repay a reward or part of a reward under KRS

431.590

, the court shall assess this cost against the defendant in the same manner as other costs of prosecution are assessed against a defendant. The court shall order the defendant to:

Pay the entire amount required when sentence is pronounced; or

Pay the entire amount required at a later date specified by the court.

After receiving a payment from a person ordered to make the payment under this section, the clerk of the court shall:

Make a record of the payment;

Forward the payment to the designated crime stoppers organization; and

Record the forwarding of the payment.

History.

Enact. Acts 1992, ch. 59, § 6, effective July 14, 1992.

431.597.
Agreement of affiliation between county and crime stoppers organization — Funding.

Any crime stoppers organization that enters into a written agreement of affiliation, as provided in subsection (2) of this section, with a county in which the organization operates shall be funded in part by a one dollar ($1) fee added to court costs in that county. The fee shall be imposed on every person who is:

Convicted of any misdemeanor or violation, other than a violation of KRS Chapters 186, 187, 188, 189, or 189A; and

Sentenced to pay a fine for the misdemeanor or violation, regardless of whether the person is also incarcerated, or whether the fine is suspended, waived, or otherwise not imposed.

Any crime stoppers organization may enter into a written agreement of affiliation, approved by a fiscal court or urban-county council, with any county, or with any number of counties, in which the organization operates. Agreements of affiliation shall be valid for two (2) years and may be renewed. The agreements shall specify:

The relationship between the crime stoppers organization, the county, and law enforcement agencies in the county; and

That the crime stoppers organization shall account annually to the fiscal court or urban-county council for all funds raised by the organization from all sources and all funds expended by the organization for any purpose. The agreement shall allow the crime stoppers organization to identify the sources of funds raised generically rather than by name. The agreement shall not require the crime stoppers organization to divulge the amounts of individual rewards paid nor the identity of any person to whom a reward was paid.

In every county where an agreement of affiliation is approved, the county clerk shall notify the circuit clerk to collect the fee required by this section. The circuit clerk shall collect the fee for two (2) years from the date the agreement was signed. When the circuit clerk pays fines and costs over to the state, the circuit clerk shall pay all money collected under this section to the crime stoppers organization named in the agreement.

The crime stoppers fee shall not be waived or suspended. Failure to pay the fee shall be treated as a failure to pay a fine under KRS Chapter 534.

Crime stoppers organizations may use the funds they receive under this section for any purpose authorized by KRS

431.575

.

History.

Enact. Acts 1998, ch. 337, § 1, effective July 15, 1998.

431.600.
Coordination of child sexual abuse investigations and prosecutions — Protection of and counseling for child victims.

Each investigation of reported or suspected sexual abuse of a child shall be conducted by a specialized multidisciplinary team composed, at a minimum, of law enforcement officers and social workers from the Cabinet for Health and Family Services. Cabinet for Health and Family Services social workers shall be available to assist in all investigations under this section but shall be lead investigators only in those cases of reported or suspected sexual abuse of a child in which a person exercising custodial control or supervision, as defined in KRS

600.020

, is the alleged or suspected perpetrator of the abuse. Additional team members may include Commonwealth’s and county attorneys, children’s advocacy center staff, mental health professionals, medical professionals, victim advocates, including those for victims of human trafficking, educators, and other related professionals, as necessary, operating under protocols governing roles, responsibilities, and procedures developed by the Kentucky Multidisciplinary Commission on Child Sexual Abuse and promulgated by the Attorney General as administrative regulations pursuant to KRS Chapter 13A.

Local protocols shall be developed in each county or group of contiguous counties by the agencies and persons specified in subsection (1) of this section specifying how the state protocols shall be followed within the county or group of contiguous counties. These protocols shall be approved by the Kentucky Multidisciplinary Commission on Child Sexual Abuse.

If adequate personnel are available, each Commonwealth’s attorney’s office and each county attorney’s office shall have a child sexual abuse specialist.

Commonwealth’s attorneys and county attorneys, or their assistants, shall take an active part in interviewing and familiarizing the child alleged to have been abused, or who is testifying as a witness, with the proceedings throughout the case, beginning as early as practicable in the case.

If adequate personnel are available, Commonwealth’s attorneys and county attorneys shall provide for an arrangement which allows one (1) lead prosecutor to handle the case from inception to completion to reduce the number of persons involved with the child victim.

Commonwealth’s attorneys and county attorneys and the Cabinet for Health and Family Services and other team members shall minimize the involvement of the child in legal proceedings, avoiding appearances at preliminary hearings, grand jury hearings, and other proceedings when possible.

Commonwealth’s attorneys and county attorneys shall make appropriate referrals for counseling, private legal services, and other appropriate services to ensure the future protection of the child when a decision is made not to prosecute the case. The Commonwealth’s attorney or county attorney shall explain the decision not to prosecute to the family or guardian, as appropriate, and to the child victim.

To the extent practicable and when in the best interest of a child alleged to have been abused, interviews with a child shall be conducted at a children’s advocacy center.

History.

Enact. Acts 1992, ch. 351, § 1, effective July 14, 1992; 1994, ch. 207, § 1, effective July 15, 1994; 1996, ch. 18, § 1, effective July 15, 1996; 1998, ch. 339, § 1, effective July 15, 1998; 1998, ch. 426, § 601, effective July 15, 1998; 2000, ch. 144, § 1, effective July 14, 2000; 2005, ch. 99, § 650, effective June 20, 2005; 2013, ch. 25, § 23, effective June 25, 2013.